Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-909
Motion; several objects authorized.

Several objects may be included in the same motion, if they all grow out of or are connected with the action or proceeding in which it is made.

R.S.1867, Code § 573, p. 495;

R.S.1913, § 7725;

C.S.1922, § 8669;

C.S.1929, § 20-909;

R.S.1943, § 25-909.

Motion for a directed verdict, see sections 25-1315.01 to 25-1315.03.

Motion for new trial, see section 25-1315.02 et seq.